Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Chapter 7.2. Health Care Data Reporting.

§ 32.1-276.2.
Health care data reporting; purpose.

The General Assembly finds that the establishment of effective health care data analysis and reporting initiatives is essential to improving the quality and efficiency of health care, fostering competition among health care providers, and increasing consumer choice with regard to health care services in the Commonwealth, and that accurate and valuable health care data can best be identified by representatives of state government and the consumer, provider, insurance, and business communities. For this reason, the State Board of Health and the State Health Commissioner, assisted by the State Department of Health and the Bureau of Insurance, shall administer the health care data reporting initiatives established by this chapter.

History.

1996, c. 902; 2010, c. 416; 2012, cc. 693, 709.

Cross references.

As to contracting for compilation, storage, analysis, evaluation, and publication of data in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter being conditionally exempt from the Virginia Public Procurement Act, see §

2.2-4345

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 902, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1999, c. 691, cl. 1, by c. 764, cl. 2, and by Acts 2002, c. 331, cl. 1, which provided that Chapter 7.2 of Title 32.1 would expire on July 1, 2008, was repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 6 and 21, cl. 1.

Acts 2010, c. 416, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department prominently display a link to the website developed and maintained by the nonprofit organization, information about accessing and searching data available through the nonprofit organization’s website, and information about how consumers can use data available through the nonprofit organization’s website to evaluate and make decisions about health care providers and services on the Department’s website.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 416 substituted “improving the quality and cost of health care, fostering competition among health care providers, and increasing consumer choice with regard to health care services” for “the improvement of the quality and cost of health care” in the first sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 693 and 709 are identical, and in the first sentence, substituted “quality and efficiency of health care” for “quality and cost of health care” and “consumer, provider, insurance, and business communities” for “consumer, hospital, nursing home, physician, insurance, and business communities” and inserted “and the Bureau of Insurance” in the last sentence.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in health care law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 199 (2002).

§ 32.1-276.3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Actual reimbursement amount”
means reimbursement information included in the claims data submitted by data suppliers to the Virginia All-Payer Claims Database, whether such information is referred to in the claims data as “paid amounts,” “allowed amounts,” or another term having the same or similar meaning and whether in reference to the payer who paid the actual reimbursement amount or the provider who received the actual reimbursement amount.

“Board”
means the Board of Health.

“Common data layout”
means the national data collection standard adopted and maintained by the APCD Council.

“Consumer”
means any person (i) whose occupation is other than the administration of health activities or the provision of health services, (ii) who has no fiduciary obligation to a health care institution or other health agency or to any organization, public or private, whose principal activity is an adjunct to the provision of health services, or (iii) who has no material financial interest in the rendering of health services.

“Covered lives”
means subscribers, policyholders, members, enrollees, or dependents, as the case may be, under a policy or contract issued or issued for delivery in Virginia by a managed care health insurance plan licensee, insurer, health services plan, or preferred provider organization.

“ERISA plan”
means any self-funded employee welfare benefit plan governed by the requirements of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. § 1002(1).

“Health care provider”
means (i) a general hospital, ordinary hospital, outpatient surgical hospital, nursing home or certified nursing facility licensed or certified pursuant to Article 1 (§

32.1-123

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of this title; (ii) a mental or psychiatric hospital licensed pursuant to Article 2 (§

37.2-403

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 37.2; (iii) a hospital operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services; (iv) a hospital operated by the University of Virginia or the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority; (v) any person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy in the Commonwealth pursuant to Chapter 29 (§ 54.1-2900 et seq.) of Title 54.1; (vi) any person licensed to furnish health care policies or plans pursuant to Chapter 34 (§

38.2-3400

et seq.), Chapter 42 (§

38.2-4200

), or Chapter 43 (§

38.2-4300

) of Title 38.2; or (vii) any person licensed to practice dentistry pursuant to Chapter 27 (§ 54.1-2700 et seq.) of Title 54.1 who is registered with the Board of Dentistry as an oral and maxillofacial surgeon and certified by the Board of Dentistry to perform certain procedures pursuant to § 54.1-2709.1. In no event shall such term be construed to include continuing care retirement communities which file annual financial reports with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2 or any nursing care facility of a religious body which depends upon prayer alone for healing.

“Health maintenance organization”
means any person who undertakes to provide or to arrange for one or more health care plans pursuant to Chapter 43 (§

38.2-4300

et seq.) of Title 38.2.

“Inpatient hospital”
means a hospital providing inpatient care and licensed pursuant to Article 1 (§

32.1-123

et seq.) of Chapter 5, a hospital licensed pursuant to Article 2 (§

37.2-403

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 37.2, a hospital operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services for the care and treatment of individuals with mental illness, or a hospital operated by the University of Virginia or the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority.

“Nonprofit organization”
means a nonprofit, tax-exempt health data organization with the characteristics, expertise, and capacity to execute the powers and duties set forth for such entity in this chapter.

“Oral and maxillofacial surgeon”
means, for the purposes of this chapter, a person who is licensed to practice dentistry in Virginia, registered with the Board of Dentistry as an oral and maxillofacial surgeon, and certified to perform certain procedures pursuant to § 54.1-2709.1.

“Oral and maxillofacial surgeon’s office”
means a place (i) owned or operated by a licensed and registered oral and maxillofacial surgeon who is certified to perform certain procedures pursuant to § 54.1-2709.1 or by a group of oral and maxillofacial surgeons, at least one of whom is so certified, practicing in any legal form whatsoever or by a corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other entity that employs or engages at least one oral and maxillofacial surgeon who is so certified, and (ii) designed and equipped for the provision of oral and maxillofacial surgery services to ambulatory patients.

“Outpatient surgery”
means all surgical procedures performed on an outpatient basis in a general hospital, ordinary hospital, outpatient surgical hospital or other facility licensed or certified pursuant to Article 1 (§

32.1-123

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of this title or in a physician’s office or oral and maxillofacial surgeon’s office, as defined above. Outpatient surgery refers only to those surgical procedure groups on which data are collected by the nonprofit organization as a part of a pilot study.

“Physician”
means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy in the Commonwealth pursuant to Chapter 29 (§ 54.1-2900 et seq.) of Title 54.1.

“Physician’s office”
means a place (i) owned or operated by a licensed physician or group of physicians practicing in any legal form whatsoever or by a corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other entity that employs or engages physicians and (ii) designed and equipped solely for the provision of fundamental medical care, whether diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, preventive or palliative, to ambulatory patients.

“Surgical procedure group”
means at least five procedure groups, identified by the nonprofit organization designated pursuant to §

32.1-276.4

in compliance with regulations adopted by the Board, based on criteria that include, but are not limited to, the frequency with which the procedure is performed, the clinical severity or intensity, and the perception or probability of risk. The nonprofit organization shall form a technical advisory group consisting of members nominated by its Board of Directors’ nominating organizations to assist in selecting surgical procedure groups to recommend to the Board for adoption.

“System”
means the Virginia Patient Level Data System.

History.

1996, cc. 902, 905, 1046; 1999, c. 764; 2000, cc. 720, 897; 2001, c. 341; 2003, c. 466; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2019, cc. 672, 673.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 902, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1999, c. 691, cl. 1, by c. 764, cl. 2, and by Acts 2002, c. 331, cl. 1, which provided that Chapter 7.2 of Title 32.1 would expire on July 1, 2008, was repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 6 and 21, cl. 1.

Acts 1996, cc. 905 and 1046, amended §§ 9-156 and 9-166.2, which fell within the span of sections repealed by Acts 1996, c. 902. At the direction of the Code Commission, these amendments have been implemented in a comparable new section enacted by c. 902, §

32.1-276.3

.

Acts 1996, cc. 905 and 1046, cl. 2 provides: “[t]hat the provisions of the first enactment amending §§ 9-156 [repealed], 9-166.2 [repealed], 23-50.11, 23-232, 32.1-85 [repealed], and

51.1-126.1

and adding

51.1-126.2

[repealed] shall become effective on the transfer date, as defined in § 23-50.15:5 [23-50.16:4].” The amendments are now effective.

Act 2022, c. 646, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Health (the Department), through its contract with the nonprofit organization described in §

32.1-276.4

of the Code of Virginia and in consultation with the Bureau of Insurance of the State Corporation Commission (the Bureau), shall by July 1, 2023, (i) develop and implement a methodology to review and measure the efficiency and productivity of health care providers and carriers, as defined in §

38.2-3407.10

of the Code of Virginia, other than limited scope dental or vision plans licensed pursuant to Chapter 45 (§

38.2-4500

et seq.) of Title 38.2, and managed care health insurance plans, as defined in §

38.2-5800

of the Code of Virginia and certified by the Department pursuant to §

32.1-137.2

of the Code of Virginia, and (ii) make available to the public on a website maintained by the nonprofit organization such data and information and other reports collected or produced as a result of implementation of such methodology. The methodology shall be designed to foster transparency and competition among both carriers and health care providers and to assist consumers in making educated decisions regarding options for health care coverage and access.”

“§ 2. The methodology described in § 1 shall:”

“1. Include provisions for comparisons of a specific carrier's or managed care health insurance plan's performance to (i) national and regional performance metrics for carriers or managed care health insurance plans, as appropriate, and (ii) other carriers or managed care health insurance plans, as appropriate;”

“2. Provide for the collection of data and information necessary to evaluate or compare (i) annual premium rates and changes to such rates over time; (ii) medical loss ratios and changes to such ratios over time; (iii) cost sharing levels and changes to such levels over time; and (iv) expenditures on inpatient hospital services, outpatient hospital services, emergency services, physician services, pharmaceuticals, and other major spending categories, and changes to such expenditures over time; and”

“3. Utilize data compiled by the Bureau and submitted to the nonprofit organization, data from data sources maintained by the Bureau and the Department, and other publicly available data sources. Such methodology may include different methodologies for the assessment of various types of carriers and managed care health insurance plans.”

“§ 3. Any data submitted by the Bureau to the Department or the nonprofit organization in accordance with this act shall be provided in a secure manner to protect the safety and confidentiality of any proprietary information of any carrier or managed care health insurance plan.”

“§ 4. The Bureau shall convene a stakeholder work group composed of representatives of the Department, the nonprofit organization described in §

32.1-276.4

of the Code of Virginia, the Virginia Association of Health Plans, the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Medical Society of Virginia, and other such stakeholders as the Bureau deems appropriate to (i) provide input on the development of the methodology described in § 1; (ii) identify additional measures to increase the transparency of information provided to the Bureau by carriers, managed care health insurance plans, and health care providers; and (iii) determine what additional information should be provided to the nonprofit organization by carriers, managed care health insurance plan providers, and health care providers to foster transparency and competition among both carriers and health care providers and assist consumers in making educated decisions regarding options for health care coverage and access. The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health by November 1, 2022.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 720 substituted “Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority” for “Medical College of Virginia Hospitals Authority” in the paragraphs defining “Health care provider” and “Inpatient hospital.”

The 2000 amendment by c. 897 added the paragraph defining “Health maintenance organization,” and in the paragraph defining “Inpatient hospital” substituted “this title” for “Title 32.1.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 341 added the paragraphs defining “Outpatient surgery,” “Physician,” “Physician’s office,” and
“Surgical procedure group.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 466, in the definition of “Health care provider,” deleted “or” at the end of clause (v), added “or” at the end of clause (vi), and added clause (vii); inserted definitions of “Oral and maxillofacial surgeon” and “Oral and maxillofacial surgeon’s office”; and inserted “or oral and maxillofacial surgeon’s office, as defined above” in the definition of “Outpatient surgery.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” in clause (iii) of the paragraph defining “Health care provider” and in the paragraph defining “Inpatient hospital,” the name change was also made and “individuals with mental illness” was substituted for “the mentally ill.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 672 and 673 are identical, and inserted the definitions for “Actual reimbursement amount,” “Common data layout,” “Covered lives,” and “ERISA plan”; and in the definition for “Inpatient hospital,” deleted “of this title” following “Chapter 5.”

§ 32.1-276.4.
Agreements for certain data services.

The Commissioner shall negotiate and enter into contracts or agreements with a nonprofit organization for the compilation, storage, analysis, and evaluation of data submitted by health care providers pursuant to this chapter; for the operation of the All-Payer Claims Database pursuant to §

32.1-276.7:1

; and for the development and administration of a methodology for the measurement and review of the efficiency and productivity of health care providers. Such nonprofit organization shall be governed by a board of directors composed of representatives of state government, including the Commissioner, representatives of the Department of Medical Assistance Services and the Bureau of Insurance, health plans and health insurance issuers, and the consumer, health care provider, and business communities. Of the health care provider representatives, there shall be an equal number of hospital, nursing home, physician, and health plan representatives. The articles of incorporation of such nonprofit organization shall require the nomination of such board members by organizations and associations representing those categories of persons specified for representation on the board of directors.

In addition to providing for the compilation, storage, analysis, and evaluation services described in subsection A, any contract or agreement with a nonprofit, tax-exempt health data organization made pursuant to this section shall require the board of directors of such organization to:

Develop and disseminate other health care quality and efficiency information designed to assist businesses and consumers in purchasing health care and long-term care services;

Prepare and make public summaries, compilations, or other supplementary reports based on the data provided pursuant to this chapter;

Collect, compile, and publish Health Employer Data and Information Set (HEDIS) information or reports or other quality of care or performance information sets approved by the Board, pursuant to §

32.1-276.5

, and submitted by health maintenance organizations or other health care plans;

Jointly determine with the Board of Medicine any data concerning safety services and quality health care services rendered by physicians to Medicaid recipients that should be identified, collected, and disseminated. The board of directors shall further determine jointly with the Board of Medicine the costs of requiring physicians to identify, submit, or collect such information and identify sufficient funding sources to appropriate to physicians for the collection of the same. No physician shall be required to collect or submit safety and quality of health care services information that is already identified, collected, or submitted under this chapter; or for which funds for collection are not appropriated;

Maintain the confidentiality and security of data as set forth in §§

32.1-276.7:1

and

32.1-276.9

;

Submit a report to the Board, the Governor, and the General Assembly no later than October 1 of each year for the preceding fiscal year. Such report shall include a certified audit, including an analysis of the efficacy and value of the All-Payer Claims Database, and provide information on the accomplishments, priorities, and current and planned activities of the nonprofit organization;

Submit, as appropriate, strategic plans to the Board, the Governor, and the General Assembly recommending specific data projects to be undertaken and specifying data elements for collection under this chapter. In developing strategic plans, the nonprofit organization shall incorporate similar activities of other public and private entities to maximize the quality of data projects and to minimize the cost and duplication of data projects. In its strategic plans, the nonprofit organization shall also evaluate the continued need for and efficacy of current data initiatives, including the use of patient level data for public health purposes. The approval of the General Assembly shall be required prior to the implementation of any recommendations set forth in a strategic plan submitted pursuant to this section;

Competitively bid or competitively negotiate all aspects of all data projects, if feasible; and

Fulfill all funded requirements set forth for the nonprofit organization in this chapter.

The Department shall take steps to increase public awareness of the data and information available through the nonprofit organization’s website and how consumers can use the data and information when making decisions about health care providers and services.

Except as provided in subdivision A 2 of §

2.2-4345

, the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) shall not apply to the activities of the Commissioner authorized by this section. Funding for services provided pursuant to any such contract or agreement shall come from general appropriations and from fees determined pursuant to §

32.1-276.8

and from such fees and other public and private funding sources as may be authorized by this chapter.

History.

1996, c. 902; 2000, c. 897; 2006, c. 426; 2010, c. 416; 2012, cc. 693, 709.

Cross references.

As to exclusion of health and social services records from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 902, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1999, c. 691, cl. 1, by c. 764, cl. 2, and by Acts 2002, c. 331, cl. 1, which provided that Chapter 7.2 of Title 32.1 would expire on July 1, 2008, was repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 6 and 21, cl. 1.

Acts 2010, c. 416, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department prominently display a link to the website developed and maintained by the nonprofit organization, information about accessing and searching data available through the nonprofit organization’s website, and information about how consumers can use data available through the nonprofit organization’s website to evaluate and make decisions about health care providers and services on the Department’s website.”

Acts 2022, c. 646, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Health (the Department), through its contract with the nonprofit organization described in §

32.1-276.4

of the Code of Virginia and in consultation with the Bureau of Insurance of the State Corporation Commission (the Bureau), shall by July 1, 2023, (i) develop and implement a methodology to review and measure the efficiency and productivity of health care providers and carriers, as defined in §

38.2-3407.10

of the Code of Virginia, other than limited scope dental or vision plans licensed pursuant to Chapter 45 (§

38.2-4500

et seq.) of Title 38.2, and managed care health insurance plans, as defined in §

38.2-5800

of the Code of Virginia and certified by the Department pursuant to §

32.1-137.2

of the Code of Virginia, and (ii) make available to the public on a website maintained by the nonprofit organization such data and information and other reports collected or produced as a result of implementation of such methodology. The methodology shall be designed to foster transparency and competition among both carriers and health care providers and to assist consumers in making educated decisions regarding options for health care coverage and access.“§ 2. The methodology described in § 1 shall:“1. Include provisions for comparisons of a specific carrier’s or managed care health insurance plan’s performance to (i) national and regional performance metrics for carriers or managed care health insurance plans, as appropriate, and (ii) other carriers or managed care health insurance plans, as appropriate;“2. Provide for the collection of data and information necessary to evaluate or compare (i) annual premium rates and changes to such rates over time; (ii) medical loss ratios and changes to such ratios over time; (iii) cost sharing levels and changes to such levels over time; and (iv) expenditures on inpatient hospital services, outpatient hospital services, emergency services, physician services, pharmaceuticals, and other major spending categories, and changes to such expenditures over time; and “3. Utilize data compiled by the Bureau and submitted to the nonprofit organization, data from data sources maintained by the Bureau and the Department, and other publicly available data sources.“Such methodology may include different methodologies for the assessment of various types of carriers and managed care health insurance plans.“§ 3. Any data submitted by the Bureau to the Department or the nonprofit organization in accordance with this act shall be provided in a secure manner to protect the safety and confidentiality of any proprietary information of any carrier or managed care health insurance plan.“§ 4. The Bureau shall convene a stakeholder work group composed of representatives of the Department, the nonprofit organization described in §

32.1-276.4

of the Code of Virginia, the Virginia Association of Health Plans, the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association, the Medical Society of Virginia, and other such stakeholders as the Bureau deems appropriate to (i) provide input on the development of the methodology described in § 1; (ii) identify additional measures to increase the transparency of information provided to the Bureau by carriers, managed care health insurance plans, and health care providers; and (iii) determine what additional information should be provided to the nonprofit organization by carriers, managed care health insurance plan providers, and health care providers to foster transparency and competition among both carriers and health care providers and assist consumers in making educated decisions regarding options for health care coverage and access. The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health by November 1, 2022.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 897 substituted the language beginning “or other quality” and ending “to §

32.1-276.5

and” for “voluntarily” in subdivision B 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 426 added subdivision B 4 and redesignated former subdivisions B 4 through B 7 as present subdivisions B 5 through B 8.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 416 inserted subsection C and redesignated former subsection C as D.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 693 and 709 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “for the operation of the All-Payer Claims Database pursuant to §

32.1-276.7:1

” in the first sentence and “representatives of the Department of Medical Assistance Services and the Bureau of Insurance, health plans and health insurance issuers” in the second sentence; in subsection B, substituted “health care quality and efficiency information” for “health care cost and quality information” in subdivision B 1, deleted “by health care providers” following “data provided” in subdivision B 2, in subdivision B 5, inserted “and security” and substituted “set forth in §§

32.1-276.7:1

and

32.1-276.9

” for “set forth in §

32.1-276.9

,” inserted “including an analysis of the efficacy and value of the All-Payer Claims Database” in subdivision B 6, in subdivision B 7, substituted “for collection under this chapter” for “that will be required from health care providers” and deleted the fourth and fifth sentences, which formerly read: “The nonprofit organization shall submit the first such strategic plan to the Board, the Governor, and the General Assembly by October 1, 1996. Such initial plan shall include recommendations for measuring quality of care for all health care providers and for funding all data projects undertaken pursuant to this chapter” and added subdivision 9; added “and from such fees and other public and private funding sources as may be authorized by this chapter” at the end of the last sentence in subsection D; and made a related change.

§ 32.1-276.5.
Providers to submit data; civil penalty.

Every health care provider shall submit data as required pursuant to regulations of the Board, consistent with the recommendations of the nonprofit organization in its strategic plans submitted and approved pursuant to §

32.1-276.4

, and as required by this section. Such data shall include relevant data and information for any parent or subsidiary company of the health care provider that operates in the Commonwealth. Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 38 (§

2.2-3800

et seq.) of Title 2.2, it shall be lawful to provide information in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

In addition, health maintenance organizations shall annually submit to the Commissioner, to make available to consumers who make health benefit enrollment decisions, audited data consistent with the latest version of the Health Employer Data and Information Set (HEDIS), as required by the National Committee for Quality Assurance, or any other quality of care or performance information set as approved by the Board. The Commissioner, at his discretion, may grant a waiver of the HEDIS or other approved quality of care or performance information set upon a determination by the Commissioner that the health maintenance organization has met Board-approved exemption criteria. The Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

The Commissioner shall also negotiate and contract with a nonprofit organization authorized under §

32.1-276.4

for compiling, storing, and making available to consumers the data submitted by health maintenance organizations pursuant to this section. The nonprofit organization shall assist the Board in developing a quality of care or performance information set for such health maintenance organizations and shall, at the Commissioner’s discretion, periodically review this information set for its effectiveness.

Every medical care facility as that term is defined in §

32.1-3

that furnishes, conducts, operates, or offers any reviewable service shall report data on utilization of such service to the Commissioner, who shall contract with the nonprofit organization authorized under this chapter to collect and disseminate such data. For purposes of this section, “reviewable service” shall mean inpatient beds, operating rooms, nursing home services, cardiac catheterization, computed tomographic (CT) scanning, stereotactic radiosurgery, lithotripsy, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), magnetic source imaging, medical rehabilitation, neonatal special care, obstetrical services, open heart surgery, positron emission tomographic (PET) scanning, psychiatric services, organ and tissue transplant services, radiation therapy, stereotactic radiotherapy, proton beam therapy, nuclear medicine imaging except for the purpose of nuclear cardiac imaging, and substance abuse treatment.

Every medical care facility for which a certificate of public need with conditions imposed pursuant to §

32.1-102.4

is issued shall report to the Commissioner data on charity care, as that term is defined in §

32.1-102.1

, provided to satisfy a condition of a certificate of public need, including (i) the total amount of such charity care the facility provided to indigent persons; (ii) the number of patients to whom such charity care was provided; (iii) the specific services delivered to patients that are reported as charity care recipients; and (iv) the portion of the total amount of such charity care provided that each service represents. The value of charity care reported shall be based on the medical care facility’s submission of applicable Diagnosis Related Group codes and Current Procedural Terminology codes aligned with methodology utilized by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for reimbursement under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq. Notwithstanding the foregoing, every nursing home as defined in §

32.1-123

for which a certificate of public need with conditions imposed pursuant to §

32.1-102.4

is issued shall report data on utilization and other data in accordance with regulations of the Board.

A medical care facility that fails to report data required by this subsection shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $100 per day per violation, which shall be collected by the Commissioner and paid into the Literary Fund.

Every continuing care retirement community established pursuant to Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2 that includes nursing home beds shall report data on utilization of such nursing home beds to the Commissioner, who shall contract with the nonprofit organization authorized under this chapter to collect and disseminate such data.

Every hospital that receives a disproportionate share hospital adjustment pursuant to § 1886(d)(5)(F) of the Social Security Act shall report, in accordance with regulations of the Board consistent with recommendations of the nonprofit organization in its strategic plan submitted and provided pursuant to §

32.1-276.4

, the number of inpatient days attributed to patients eligible for Medicaid but not Medicare Part A and the total amount of the disproportionate share hospital adjustment received.

Every hospital shall annually report, in accordance with regulations of the Board consistent with recommendations of the nonprofit organization in its strategic plan submitted and provided pursuant to §

32.1-276.4

, data and information regarding (i) the amount of charity care, discounted care, or other financial assistance provided by the hospital under its financial assistance policy pursuant to §

32.1-137.09

and (ii) the amount of uncollected bad debt, including any uncollected bad debt from payment plans entered into in accordance with subsection C of §

32.1-137.09

.

The Board shall evaluate biennially the impact and effectiveness of such data collection.

History.

1996, c. 902; 2000, c. 897; 2006, c. 426; 2009, c. 175; 2013, c. 515; 2017, c. 791; 2018, c. 596; 2020, c. 1271; 2022, cc. 678, 679.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 902, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1999, c. 691, cl. 1, by c. 764, cl. 2, and by Acts 2002, c. 331, cl. 1, which provided that Chapter 7.2 of Title 32.1 would expire on July 1, 2008, was repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 6 and 21, cl. 1.

Acts 2013, c. 515, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act related to an open admission period for nursing facilities of continuing care retirement communities shall only apply to facilities for which an application for an initial three year open admission period was accepted by the Commissioner of Health on or after July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2017, c. 791, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner of Health shall report to the Chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Finance and Education and Health by November 1, 2018, a data analysis comparing the value of (i) the total amount of charity care as defined in §

32.1-102.1

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, that each medical care facility provided to indigent persons; (ii) the number of patients to whom charity care was provided; (iii) the specific services delivered to patients that are reported as charity care recipients; and (iv) the portion of the total amount of charity care provided that each service represents to comply with any conditions on such certificates based on the method utilized for valuing such care as of July 1, 2017, to the medical care facility’s cost using a method established by the nonprofit organization defined in §

32.1-276.3

of the Code of Virginia and to the value of such care based on the provider reimbursement methodology utilized by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for reimbursement under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 897 designated the former undesignated single paragraph, as present subsection A, and inserted “and as required by this section,” and added new subsections B, C, and D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 426 reenacted the section without change.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 175, effective March 25, 2009, added the first paragraph in subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 515 added subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 791, in subsection A, inserted the second sentence; in subsection C, added the second paragraph; inserted subsection E, and redesignated former subsection E as subsection F.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 596 transferred the former last paragraph in subsection C to the last paragraph in subsection B; added the last paragraph in subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1271 substituted “§

32.1-3

” for “§

32.1-102.1

” in subsection C, first paragraph, first sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 678 and 679 are identical, and redesignated former subsection F as subsection G; and added subsection F.

§ 32.1-276.5:1.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 693 and 709, cl. 2, effective May 11, 2017.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 693 and 709, cl. 2 provides: “That §

32.1-276.5:1

of the Code of Virginia is repealed upon certification by the nonprofit organization with which the Commissioner of Health has entered into a contract or agreement pursuant to §

32.1-276.4

of the Code of Virginia to the Commissioner that it has received 12 months of claims data.” The nonprofit certified to the Commissioner that it has received 12 months of claims data on May 11, 2017. The Virginia Code Commission has advised that §

32.1-276.5:1

is now repealed.

Former §

32.1-276.5:1

, pertaining to disclosures of contractual arrangements to be made publicly available, derived from Acts 2008, cc. 71, 102.